North Carolina statutes. Chapter 115D. Community Colleges.
Article 2. Local Administration.

§ 115D-12.
Each institution to have board of trustees; selection of trustees.

Each community college established or operated pursuant to this Chapter shall be governed by a board of trustees consisting of 13 members, or of additional members if selected according to the special procedure prescribed by the third paragraph of this subsection, who shall be selected by the following agencies. No member of the General Assembly may be appointed to a local board of trustees for a community college.

Group One —

four trustees, elected by the board of education of the public school administrative unit located in the administrative area of the institution. If there are two or more public school administrative units, whether city or county units, or both, located within the administrative area, the trustees shall be elected jointly by all of the boards of education of those units, each board having one vote in the election of each trustee, except as provided in

G.S. 115D-59

. No board of education shall elect a member of the board of education or any person employed by the board of education to serve as a trustee, however, any such person currently serving on a board of trustees shall be permitted to fulfill the unexpired portion of the trustee’s current term.

Group Two —

four trustees, elected by the board of commissioners of the county in which the institution is located. Provided, however, if the administrative area of the institution is composed of two or more counties, the trustees shall be elected jointly by the boards of commissioners of all those counties, each board having one vote in the election of each trustee. Provided, also, the county commissioners of the county in which the community college has established a satellite campus may elect an additional two members if the board of trustees of the community college agrees. No more than one trustee from Group Two may be a member of a board of county commissioners. Should the boards of education or the boards of commissioners involved be unable to agree on one or more trustees the senior resident superior court judge in the superior court district or set of districts as defined in

G.S. 7A-41.1

where the institution is located shall fill the position or positions by appointment.

Group Three —

four trustees, appointed by the Governor.

Group Four —

the president of the student government or the chairman of the executive board of the student body of each community college established pursuant to this Chapter shall be an ex officio nonvoting member of the board of trustees of each said institution.

All trustees shall be residents of the administrative area of the institution for which they are selected or of counties contiguous thereto with the exception of members provided for in subsection (a) of this section, Group Four.

(b1)

No person who has been employed full time by the community college within the prior 5 years and no spouse or child of a person currently employed full time by the community college shall serve on the board of trustees of that college.

Vacancies occurring in any group for whatever reason shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term by the agency or agencies authorized to select trustees of that group and in the manner in which regular selections are made. Should the selection of a trustee not be made by the agency or agencies having the authority to do so within 60 days after the date on which a vacancy occurs, whether by creation or expiration of a term or for any other reason, the Governor shall fill the vacancy by appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1977, c. 823, s. 104; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; 1985, c. 757, s. 147; 1987, c. 564, ss. 10, 12; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 111; 1991, c. 283, s. 1; 1995, c. 470, s. 1; 2009-549, s. 19; 2013-410, s. 9.

Local Modification.

Anson and Union: 1999-60, s. 2; (As to subsection (a)) Asheville-Buncombe Technical Community College: 2013-175, s. 1; 2020-20, s. 1; (As to subsection (a)) Beaufort County Community College: 2015-167, s. 1, as amended by 2015-264, s. 63(a); Central Carolina Community College: 2014-115, s. 51(a); 2015-252, s. 2; Cleveland Community College: 2018-15, s. 2(a), (b); 2021-102, s. 5(a); College of the Albemarle: 1997-12, s. 1; (As to subsection (a)) Durham Technical Community College: 2014-73, s. 1; (As to subsections (a), (b)) Isothermal Community College: 2015-243, s. 1 (applicable to appointments to terms beginning on or after July 1, 2016); 2021-52, ss. 1, 2 (applicable to appointments to terms beginning on or after July 1, 2021); Stanly Community College: 2011-175; Tri-County Community College: 2015-12, s. 1; Wake Technical Community College: 2012-99, s. 1.

§ 115D-13.
Terms of office of trustees.

The regular terms of trustees appointed in 1981 and trustees appointed in 1987 shall be extended for one year. The term of one or more trustees, as appropriate, elected pursuant to

G.S. 115D-12

may be extended for one year so that these terms will be staggered, unless they are already staggered.

Except for the one year extensions of terms set forth in subsection (a) of this section, and for the ex officio member, as the terms of trustees currently in office expire, their successors shall be appointed for four-year terms.All terms shall commence on July 1 of the year.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1977, c. 823, s. 5; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; 1985, c. 58; 1989, c. 521, s. 1.

§ 115D-14.
Board of trustees a body corporate; corporate name and powers; title to property.

The board of trustees of each institution shall be a body corporate with powers to enable it to acquire, hold, and transfer real and personal property, to enter into contracts, to institute and defend legal actions and suits, and to exercise such other rights and privileges as may be necessary for the management and administration of the institution in accordance with the provisions and purposes of this Chapter. The official title of each board shall be “The Trustees of
_______________ ” (filling in the name of the institution) and such title shall be the official corporate name of the institution.

The several boards of trustees shall hold title to all real and personal property donated to their respective institutions by private persons or purchased with funds provided by the tax-levying authorities of their respective institutions. Title to equipment furnished by the State shall remain in the State Board of Community Colleges. In the event that an institution shall cease to operate, title to all real and personal property donated to the institution or purchased with funds provided by the tax-levying authorities, except as provided for in

G.S. 115D-14

, shall vest in the county in which the institution is located, unless the terms of the deed of gift in the case of donated property provides otherwise, or unless in the case of two or more counties forming a joint institution the contract provided for in G.S. 115D-71 provides otherwise.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; c. 896, s. 13; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1130, s. 1.

Local Modification.

Gaston, Greene, and Sampson: 1995, c. 399, s. 3 (repealed effective January 1, 2000 by Session Laws 1999, c. 115, s. 3; see Editor’s Note.)

§ 115D-15.
Sale, exchange or lease of property; use of proceeds from donated property.

The board of trustees of any institution organized under this Chapter may, with the prior approval of the North Carolina Community Colleges System Office, convey a right-of-way or easement for highway construction or for utility installations or modifications. When in the opinion of the board of trustees the use of any other real property owned or held by the board of trustees is unnecessary or undesirable for the purposes of the institution, the board of trustees, subject to prior approval of the State Board of Community Colleges, may sell or dispose of the property. For purposes of this section, “dispose” means “lease, exchange, or demolish.” The board of trustees may dispose of any personal property owned or held by the board of trustees without approval of the State Board of Community Colleges. Personal property titled to the State Board of Community Colleges consistent with

G.S. 115D-14

and

G.S. 115D-58.5

may be transferred to another community college at no cost and without the approval of the Department of Administration, Division of Surplus Property.Article 12 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes shall apply to the disposal or sale of any real or personal property under this subsection. Personal property also may be disposed of under procedures adopted by the North Carolina Department of Administration. The proceeds of any sale or lease shall be used for capital outlay purposes, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

Subject to rules adopted by the State Board, if real or personal property is donated to a community college to support a specific educational purpose, the board of trustees may use the proceeds from the sale or lease of the property according to the terms of the donation. The board of trustees shall use the procedures authorized under Article 12 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes when selling or leasing property under this subsection.

History.

1969, c. 338; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; c. 896, s. 13; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1130, s. 1; 1998-72, s. 1; 1998-217, s. 39; 2001-82, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 8.9; 2014-115, s. 51.5.

Local Modification.

Chatham: 1995, c. 80, s. 2; Gaston: 1995, c. 399, ss. 1, 3 (repealed effective January 1, 2000 by Session Laws 1999, c. 115, s. 3; see Editor’s Note); Montgomery: 1995, c. 154, s. 3 (repealed effective January 1, 2000 by Session Laws 1999, c. 115, s. 3; see Editor’s Note) Nash: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 706 (repealed effective January 1, 2000 by Session Laws 1999, c. 115, s. 3; see Editor’s Note); Sampson: 1995, c. 399, ss. 1, 3 (repealed effective January 1, 2000 by Session Laws 1999, c. 115, s. 3; see Editor’s Note), 1995, c. 399, ss. 1, 3 (repealed effective January 1, 2000 by Session Laws 1999, c. 115, s. 3; see Editor’s Note); Wilson: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 706 (repealed effective January 1, 2000 by Session Laws 1999, c. 115, s. 3; see Editor’s Note); Asheville-Buncombe Technical Community College: 2000-99, ss. 1, 2; Board of Trustees of College of the Albemarle: 2002-57, s. 1 (expiring December 31, 2005); Board of Trustees of Guilford Technical Community College:
2011-153, ss. 1, 2, as amended by 2014-100, s. 10.9(a); Mayland Community College: 2003-320, s. 1, as amended by 2004-203, s. 81, and as amended by 2006-5, s. 1; New Hanover County Board of Education: 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 917; Surry Community College: 2013-67, s. 1.

§ 115D-15.1.
Disposition, acquisition, and construction of property by community college.

Disposition. — Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 115D-14

, 115D-15, and 160A-274, the board of trustees of a community college may, in connection with additions, improvements, renovations, or repairs to all or part of its property, lease, sell, or otherwise dispose of any of its property to the county in which the property is located for any price and on any terms negotiated between the board of trustees of the community college and the board of county commissioners.

Transfer. — An agreement under subsection (a) of this section shall require the county to transfer the property back to the board of trustees of the community college when any financing agreement entered into by the county to finance the additions, improvements, renovations, and repairs has been satisfied.Notwithstanding the transfer of property to the county, the provisions of subsection (d) of this section,

G.S. 143-129

, and

G.S. 143-341

apply to the capital improvement project.

Acquisition and Construction. — Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 115D-14

and

G.S. 115D-20(3)

, the board of trustees of a community college may acquire, by any lawful method, any interest in real or personal property in the county in which the community college is located or in its service delivery area for use by the board of trustees. The board of trustees may contract for the construction, equipping, expansion, improvement, renovation, repair, or otherwise making available for use by the board of trustees of the community college of all or part of the property upon any terms negotiated between the board of trustees of the community college and the board of county commissioners.

Approval. — The actions of a board of trustees of a community college taken pursuant to this section are subject to the approval of the State Board of Community Colleges.

Contract Responsibility. — A county’s obligations under a financing contract entered into by the county to finance improvements to real or personal property pursuant to this section shall be the responsibility of the county and not the responsibility of the board of trustees of the community college.

History.

1999-115, s. 2; 2007-484, s. 29(b).

Local Modification.

Buncombe: 2013-112, s. 1, as amended by 2018-115, s. 1 (as to subsection (c), and applicable only to construction projects and renovations funded entirely with county funds and coordinated by the County for College uses and purposes between January 1, 2012, and December 31, 2023); Burke: 2007-35, s. 1(a) (as to building located at 2128 South Sterling Street in Morganton); Cleveland: 2009-35, s. 1; Henderson: 2016-22, s. 1 (applicable only to construction and renovation projects by the County at Blue Ridge Community College between January 1, 2015, and December 31, 2020); 2017-21, s. 1 (applicable only to construction and renovation projects by Henderson County on the campus of Blue Ridge Community College located within Henderson County between January 1, 2016, and December 31, 2021); 2019-66 (applicable only to construction and renovation projects by Henderson County on the Henderson County campus of Blue Ridge Community College between January 1, 2019, and December 31, 2023); Stanley: 2014-82, s. 1(a), as amended by 2019-31, s. 1 (as to subsections (b) and (d), and applicable to contracts awarded on or before June 30, 2024); Board of Trustees of Beaufort County Community College: 2009-168, s. 1.1; Cleveland Community College: 2009-35, s. 1; Richmond Community College and City of Laurinburg: 2008-72 (expires December 31, 2011); Stanley Community College: 2014-82, s. 1(a), as amended by 2019-31, s. 1 (as to subsections (b) and (d), and applicable to contracts awarded on or before June 30, 2024); Surry Community College: 2013-67, s. 1; Western Piedmont Community College: 2007-35, s. 1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-484, s. 29(b), effective October 1, 2007, in subsection (b), deleted the last sentence in the first paragraph, which read: “If the county did not enter into a financing agreement, the agreement under subsection (a) of this section shall require the county to transfer the property back to the board of trustees of the community college upon the completion of the additions, improvements, renovations, and repairs,” and added the second paragraph; in subsection (c), substituted “in the county” for “from the county”, inserted “or in its service delivery area”, and substituted “trustees. The board of trustees may contract” for “trustees and may contract.”

§ 115D-16.
Elective officials serving as trustees.

The office of trustee of any institution established or operated pursuant to this Chapter is hereby declared to be an office which may be held by the holder of any elective office, as defined in

G.S. 128-1.1(d)

, in addition to and concurrently with those offices permitted by

G.S. 128-1.1

. Appointments made on or before July 1, 1985, by boards of county commissioners or local boards of education of their own members as trustees are hereby validated, ratified, and confirmed.

History.

1979, c. 462, s. 2; 1985, c. 773.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Member of the Parks and Recreation Authority who holds an appointment as trustee of a community college

may also hold an elective office in the local government of the town. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Daniel C. Oakley, General Counsel, Department of Environment and Natural Resources, 2003 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 6 (8/19/03).

§ 115D-17.
Compensation of trustees.

Trustees shall receive no compensation for their services but shall receive reimbursement, according to regulations adopted by the State Board of Community Colleges, for cost of travel, meals, and lodging while performing their official duties. The reimbursement of the trustees from State funds shall not exceed the amounts permitted in

G.S. 138-5

.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; c. 896, s. 13; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1130, s. 1; 2001-424, s. 30.15A; 2001-513, s. 6.

§ 115D-18.
Organization of boards; meetings.

At the first meeting held on or after July 1, each board of trustees shall elect from its membership a chair, who shall preside at all board meetings, and a vice-chair, who shall preside in the absence of the chair. The trustees shall also elect a secretary, who may be a trustee, to keep the minutes of all board meetings. All three officers of the board shall be elected for a period of one year but shall be eligible for reelection by the board.

Each board of trustees shall meet as often as may be necessary for the conduct of the business of the institution but shall meet at least six times a year. Meetings may be called by the chair of the board, a majority of the trustees, or the chief administrative officer of the institution.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; 2007-197, s. 1; 2018-92, s. 1(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-197, s. 1, effective July 8, 2007, substituted “board, a majority of the trustees, or” for “board or by” in the last sentence of the second paragraph.

Session Laws 2018-92, s. 1(b), effective June 25, 2018, substituted “held on or after July 1” for “after its selection” in the first paragraph and “six times a year” for “once every three months” in the second paragraph and made gender neutral changes throughout.

§ 115D-19.
Removal of trustees.

Should the State Board of Community Colleges have sufficient evidence that any member of the board of trustees of an institution is not capable of discharging, or is not discharging, the duties of his office as required by law or lawful regulation, or is guilty of immoral or disreputable conduct, the State Board shall notify the chairman of such board of trustees, unless the chairman is the offending member, in which case the other members of the board shall be notified. Upon receipt of such notice there shall be a meeting of the board of trustees for the purpose of investigating the charges, at that meeting a representative of the State Board of Community Colleges may appear to present evidence of the charges. The allegedly offending member shall be given proper and adequate notice of the meeting and the findings of the other members of the board shall be recorded, along with the action taken, in the minutes of the board of trustees. If the charges are, by an affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the board, found to be true, the board of trustees shall declare the office of the offending member to be vacant.Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of a board of trustees to hold a hearing as provided herein upon evidence known or presented to it.

A board of trustees may declare vacant the office of a member who does not attend three consecutive, scheduled meetings without justifiable excuse. A board of trustees may also declare vacant the office of a member who, without justifiable excuse, does not participate within six months of appointment in a trustee orientation and education session sponsored by the North Carolina Association of Community College Trustees. The board of trustees shall notify the appropriate appointing authority of any vacancy.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; c. 896, s. 13; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1130, s. 1; 1989, c. 521, s. 2; 1995, c. 470, s. 2.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Under this section, the board of trustees of a community college has the power to remove one of its members.

See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. N. Jerry Owens, Jr., Secretary, Board of Trustees of Rockingham Community College, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 52 (1985).

Repeated absences from meetings, at some point, constitutes neglect of duty sufficient to permit a board of trustees to remove a board member for failure to discharge his duties. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. N. Jerry Owens, Jr., Secretary, Board of Trustees of Rockingham Community College, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 52 (1985).

§ 115D-20.
Powers and duties of trustees.

The trustees of each institution shall constitute the local administrative board of such institution, with such powers and duties as are provided in this Chapter and as are delegated to it by the State Board of Community Colleges. The powers and duties of trustees shall include the following:

To elect a president or chief administrative officer of the institution for such term and under such conditions as the trustees may fix. If the board of trustees chooses to use a search consultant to assist with the election process, the board of trustees shall select the search consultant through a competitive request for proposals process. A search consultant selected pursuant to this subdivision who is collecting a fee for the consultant’s services shall not be (i) an employee of a State agency, department, or institution, an appointed member of a State commission or board, or an elected official whose responsibilities include oversight or budgetary aspects of the Community College System, (ii) a lobbyist or lobbyist principal as defined in

G.S. 120C-100

, or (iii) a State-level community college board of trustees association or organization. A contract with a search consultant pursuant to this subdivision shall not be subject to Article 3C of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes. The election of a president or chief administrative officer shall be subject to the approval of the State Board of Community Colleges.

To elect or employ all other personnel of the institution upon nomination by the president or chief administrative officer, subject to standards established by the State Board of Community Colleges. Trustees may delegate the authority of employing such other personnel to its president or chief administrative officer.

To purchase any land, easement, or right-of-way which shall be necessary for the proper operation of the institution, upon approval of the State Board of Community Colleges, and if necessary, to acquire land by condemnation in the same manner and under the same procedures as provided in General Statutes Chapter 40A. For the purpose of condemnation, the determination by the trustees as to the location and amount of land to be taken and the necessity therefor shall be conclusive.

To apply the standards and requirements for admission and graduation of students and other standards established by the State Board of Community Colleges. Notwithstanding any law or administrative rule to the contrary, local community colleges are permitted to offer the following programs:

Subject to the approval of the State Board of Community Colleges, local community colleges may collaborate with local school administrative units to offer courses through the following programs:

Cooperative innovative high school programs as provided by Part 9 of Article 16 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes.

Academic transition pathways for qualified junior and senior high school students that lead to a career technical education certificate, diploma, or State or industry-recognized credential and academic transition pathways for qualified freshmen and sophomore high school students that lead to a career technical education certificate or diploma in (i) industrial and engineering technologies, (ii) agriculture and natural resources, (iii) transportation technology, (iv) construction, or (v) business technologies.

College transfer pathways requiring the successful completion of 30 semester credit hours of transfer courses, including English and mathematics, for the following students:

Qualified junior and senior high school students.

Qualified freshman and sophomore high school students, if all of the following requirements are met:

The student is determined to be academically gifted, have a demonstrated readiness for the course material, and have the maturity to justify admission to the community college by (i) the community college president, (ii) the student’s high school principal or equivalent administrator, and (iii) the academically gifted coordinator, if one is employed by the high school or local school administrative unit.

The student participates in academic advising focused on the implications of being admitted to college early with representatives from the high school and the community college.

The student’s parent or guardian has given consent for the student to participate.

During the summer quarter, persons less than 16 years old may be permitted to take noncredit courses on a self-supporting basis, subject to rules of the State Board of Community Colleges.

High school students may be permitted to take noncredit courses in safe driving on a self-supporting basis during the academic year or the summer.

High school students 16 years and older may be permitted to take noncredit courses, except adult basic skills, subject to rules promulgated by the State Board of Community Colleges.

(5)

To receive and accept donations, gifts,
devises, and the like from private donors and to apply them or invest any of them and apply the proceeds for purposes and upon the terms which the donor may prescribe and which are consistent with the provisions of this Chapter and the regulations of the State Board of Community Colleges.

(6)

To provide all or part of the instructional services for the institution by contracting with other public or private organizations or institutions in accordance with regulations and standards adopted by the State Board of Community Colleges.

(7)

To perform such other acts and do such other things as may be necessary or proper for the exercise of the foregoing specific powers, including the adoption and enforcement of all reasonable rules, regulations, and bylaws for the government and operation of the institution under this Chapter and for the discipline of students.

(8)

If a board of trustees of an institution provides access to its buildings and campus and the student information directory to persons or groups which make students aware of occupational or educational options, the board of trustees shall provide access on the same basis to official recruiting representatives of the military forces of the State and of the United States for the purpose of informing students of educational and career opportunities available in the military.

(9)

To encourage the establishment of private, nonprofit corporations to support the institution. The president, with approval of the board of trustees, may assign employees to assist with the establishment and operation of such corporation and may make available to the corporation office space, equipment, supplies and other related resources; provided, the sole purpose of the corporation is to support the institution. The board of directors of each private, nonprofit corporation shall secure and pay for the services of the State Auditor’s Office or employ a certified public accountant to conduct an annual audit of the financial accounts of the corporation. The board of directors shall transmit to the board of trustees a copy of the annual financial audit report of the private nonprofit corporation.

(10)

To enter into guaranteed energy savings contracts pursuant to Part 2 of Article 3B of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

(10a)

To enter into loan agreements under the Energy Improvement Loan Program pursuant to Part 3 of Article 36 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

(11)

To enter into lease purchase and installment purchase contracts for equipment and real property under

G.S. 115D-58.15

.

(12)

Notwithstanding the provisions of this Chapter, a community college may permit the use of its personnel or facilities, in support of or by a private business enterprise located on a community college campus or in the service area of a community college for the specific purposes set out in G.S. 66-58(c)(3a) and G.S. 66-58(c)(3d). The board of trustees of a community college must specifically approve any use of facilities or personnel under this subdivision. The State Board shall adopt rules to implement this subdivision, G.S. 66-58(c)(3a), and G.S. 66-58(c)(3d).

(13)

To enter into a public/private partnership in which all of the following conditions are met:

a.

The agreement is approved in advance by the State Board of Community Colleges.

b.

The board of trustees agrees to lease community college land to a private entity on condition that the entity construct a facility on the leased land.

c.

The facility will be jointly owned and used by the private entity and the community college.

d.

The board of trustees is not authorized to lease the facility as lessee under a long-term lease or capital lease from the private entity as lessor.

The board of trustees is not authorized to finance its portion of the facility by entering into an installment contract or other financing contract with the private entity.

State bond funds shall not be used to pay for construction of that part of the facility to be owned and used by the private entity.

The provisions of

G.S. 143-341(3)

a. apply to the construction of a facility under this subsection.

(14)

To comply with the design and construction requirements regarding energy efficiency and water use in the Sustainable Energy-Efficient Buildings Program under Article 8C of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

History.

1963, c. 448, s. 23; 1979, c. 462, s. 2; c. 896, s. 13; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1130, s. 1; 1981, c. 901, s. 2; 1983, c. 378, s. 1; c. 596, s. 1; 1985, c. 191; 1987, c. 383, s. 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 775, s. 7; 1998-111, s. 1; 2001-368, s. 2; 2003-286, s. 1; 2005-247, s. 2; 2006-259, s. 21; 2007-476, s. 1; 2008-203, s. 2; 2009-119, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 7.1A(h); 2011-284, s. 82; 2011-391, s. 13(c); 2011-419, s. 2; 2013-310, s. 2; 2013-360, s. 10.9(a); 2015-241, s. 10.4; 2017-6, s. 3; 2017-57, ss. 9.7(a), 9.10(b); 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1; 2019-185, s. 1.

Local Modification.

Gaston, Greene, and Sampson: 1995, c. 399, s. 3 (repealed effective January 1, 2000 by Session Laws 1999, c. 115, s. 3; see Editor’s Note.)

Cross References.

As to information and financial assistance for nursing students and inactive nurses, see Article 9B of Chapter 90, G.S. 90-171.50 et seq.

As to report on guaranteed energy savings contracts, see

G.S. 143-64.17

G.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor substituted “G.S. 163A-250” for “G.S. 120C-100” in subdivision (1).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in subdivision (1).

§ 115D-20.1.
Policy prohibiting tobacco use in community college buildings, grounds, and at community college-sponsored events.

As used in this section:

“Tobacco product” includes cigarettes, cigars, blunts, bidis, pipes, chewing tobacco, snus, snuff, and any other items containing or reasonably resembling tobacco or tobacco products.

“Tobacco use” includes smoking, chewing, dipping, or any other use of tobacco products.

Local community college boards of trustees may adopt, implement, and enforce a written policy prohibiting at all times the use of any tobacco product by any person in community college buildings, in community college facilities, on community college campuses, in vehicles owned, leased, or operated by the local community college, and in or on any other community college property owned, leased, or operated by the local community college. The policy may also prohibit the use of all tobacco products by persons attending a community college-sponsored event.

The policy adopted by a local community college board of trustees may include the following elements:

Adequate notice of the policy to students, parents, the public, and school personnel.

Posting of signs prohibiting at all times the use of tobacco products by any person in and on community college property.

Requirements that community college personnel develop plans for successful implementation of and compliance with the policy.

Permission for tobacco products to be included in instructional or research activities in community college buildings if the activity is conducted or supervised by the faculty member overseeing the instruction or research and the activity does not include smoking, chewing, or otherwise ingesting the tobacco product.

Nothing in

G.S. 130A-498

,

G.S. 143-595

through

G.S. 143-601

, or any other section prohibits a local community college board of trustees from adopting and enforcing a more restrictive policy on the use of tobacco in community college buildings, in community college facilities, on community college campuses, or at community college-related or community college-sponsored events, and in or on other community college property.

The North Carolina Tobacco Prevention and Control Branch and the Health and Wellness Trust Fund Commission shall work with local community college boards of trustees to provide assistance with the development and implementation of the policy including providing information regarding smoking cessation and prevention resources.

History.

2008-95, ss. 2, 3.

§ 115D-20.2.
Student organizations; rights and recognition.

No community college that grants recognition to any student organization shall deny recognition to a student organization or deny to a student organization access to programs, funding, facilities, or other privileges associated with official recognition otherwise available to another student organization, on the basis of the organization’s exercise of its rights pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

To the extent allowed by State and federal law, a religious or political student organization may, in conformity with the organization’s established written doctrines expressing the organization’s faith or mission, (i) determine that only persons professing the faith or mission of the group, and comporting themselves in conformity with, are qualified to serve as leaders of that organization, (ii) order its internal affairs according to the established written doctrines, and (iii) resolve the organization’s disputes according to the established written doctrines.

History.

2014-28, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to rights and recognition of student organizations at institutions of higher learning, see

G.S. 116-40.12

.